Utah statutes.
20A-7-504.   Circulation requirements -- Local clerk to provide sponsors
with materials.
(1)  In order to obtain the necessary number of signatures required by this
part, the sponsors shall circulate initiative packets that meet the form
requirements of this part.
(2)  The local clerk shall furnish to the sponsors:
(a) one copy of the initiative petition; and
(b) one signature sheet.
(3)  The sponsors of the petition shall:
(a)  arrange and pay for the printing of all additional copies of the petition
and signature sheets; and
(b)  ensure that the copies of the petition and signature sheets meet the form
requirements of this section.
(4) (a)  The sponsors may prepare the initiative for circulation by creating
multiple initiative packets.
(b)  The sponsors shall create those packets by binding a copy of the
initiative petition, a copy of the proposed law, and no more than 50 signature
sheets together at the top in such a way that the packets may be conveniently
opened for signing.
(c)  The sponsors need not attach a uniform number of signature sheets to each
initiative packet.
(5) (a)  After the sponsors have prepared sufficient initiative packets, they
shall return them to the local clerk.
(b)  The local clerk shall:
(i)  number each of the initiative packets and return them to the sponsors
within five working days; and
(ii)  keep a record of the numbers assigned to each packet.
